Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 9

Contribution and Distribution

43-38-901. Allocation of profits and losses.

The bylaws shall prescribe the allocation of profits and losses between patron membership interests collectively and other membership interests. If the bylaws do not otherwise provide, the profits and losses between patron membership interests collectively and other membership interests shall be allocated on the basis of the value of contributions to capital made by the patron membership interests collectively and other membership interests and accepted by the cooperative. The allocation of profits to the patron membership interests collectively shall not be less than fifteen percent (15%) of the total profits in any fiscal year.

The bylaws shall prescribe the distribution of cash or other assets of the cooperative among the membership interests of the cooperative. If not otherwise provided in the bylaws, distribution shall be made to the patron membership interests collectively and other members on the basis of the value of contributions to capital made and accepted by the cooperative by the patron membership interests collectively and other membership interests. The distributions to patron membership interests collectively shall not be less than fifteen percent (15%) of the total distributions in any fiscal year.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 28.

43-38-902. Creation and maintance of a capital reserve — Distribution of net income.

A cooperative may set aside a portion of net income allocated to the patron membership interests as the board determines advisable to create or maintain a capital reserve.

In addition to a capital reserve, the board may, for patron membership interests:

Set aside an amount not to exceed five percent (5%) of the annual net income of the cooperative for promoting and encouraging cooperative organization; and

Establish and accumulate reserves for new buildings, machinery and equipment, depreciation, losses, and other proper purposes.

Net income allocated to patron members in excess of dividends on equity and additions to reserves shall be distributed to patron members on the basis of patronage. A cooperative may establish allocation units, whether the units are functional, divisional, departmental, geographic, or otherwise, and pooling arrangements, and may account for and distribute net income to patrons on the basis of allocation units and pooling arrangements. A cooperative may offset the net loss of an allocation unit or pooling arrangement against the net income of other allocation units or pooling arrangements.

Distribution of net income shall be made at least annually. The board shall present to the members at their annual meeting a report covering the operations of the cooperative during the preceding fiscal year.

A cooperative may distribute net income to patron members in cash, capital credits, allocated patronage equities, revolving fund certificates, or its own or other securities.

The cooperative may provide in the bylaws that nonmember patrons are allowed to participate in the distribution of net income payable to patron members on equal terms with patron members.

If a nonmember patron with patronage credits is not qualified or eligible for membership, a refund due may be credited to the patron's individual account. The board may issue a certificate of interest to reflect the credited amount. After the patron is issued a certificate of interest, the patron may participate in the distribution of income on the same basis as a patron member.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 28.

43-38-903. Limitations on distribution.

No distribution may be made by a cooperative if, after giving effect to the distribution:

The cooperative would not be able to pay its debts as they became due in the normal course of business; or

The cooperative's total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities, plus, unless the articles or bylaws permit otherwise, the amount that would be needed if the cooperative were to be dissolved at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution of members whose preferential rights are superior to the rights of members receiving the distribution and excluding liabilities for which the recourse of creditors is limited to specified property of the cooperative, except that the fair value of property that is subject to a liability for which the recourse is limited shall be included in the assets of the cooperative only to the extent that the fair value of the property exceeds that liability.

The cooperative may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (a) either on:

Financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances; or

A fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the circumstances.

The effect of a distribution under subsection (a) is measured as:

The date the distribution is authorized if the payment occurs within four (4) months after the date of authorization; or

The date the payment is made if it occurs more than four (4) months after the date of authorization.

If indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest on the indebtedness is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is actually made.

A cooperative's indebtedness to a member incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the cooperative's indebtedness to its general unsecured creditors, except to the extent subordinated by agreement and except to the extent provided otherwise by § 43-38-1009(c).

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 28.

43-38-904. Liability for unlawful distribution.

Unless the member or director complies with the applicable standards of conduct set forth in § 43-38-616, a member or director who votes for or assents to a distribution made in violation of § 43-38-903 or the articles or bylaws is personally liable to the cooperative for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating § 43-38-903 or the articles or bylaws.

A director or member held liable for an unlawful distribution under subsection (a) is entitled to contribution:

From every other director and member who voted for or assented to the distribution; and

From each member for the amount the member accepted, knowing the distribution was made in violation of § 43-38-903 or the articles or bylaws.

Subject to subsection (d), this section shall not affect any obligation or liability of a director or member under the articles or bylaws or other applicable law for the amount of a distribution.

Unless otherwise agreed, a member who receives a distribution from a cooperative or an officer or director who votes for or assents to the distribution shall have no liability under this section or other applicable law for the amount of the distribution after the expiration of three (3) years from the date of the distribution.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 29.